Hawaii statutes.
[§171-37.5] Withdrawal or taking of
leased land; fair compensation. (a) Upon a withdrawal or taking of leased
land pursuant to section 171-37(3) that causes any portion of the land to
become unusable for the specific use or uses for which it was leased, the lease
rent shall be reduced in proportion to the value of the land withdrawn or made
unusable; provided that if any permanent improvement made to or constructed
upon the land by the lessee is destroyed or made unusable in the process of the
withdrawal or taking, the proportionate value thereof shall be paid to the
lessee based upon the unexpired term of the lease. No land that is under
cultivation shall be withdrawn or taken until the crops are harvested, unless
the board pays the lessee the value of the crops.

Upon a withdrawal, any person with a long-term
lease shall be compensated for the present value of all permanent improvements
in place at the time of the withdrawal that were legally made to or constructed
upon the land by the lessee of the leased land being withdrawn.

In the case of tree-crops, as defined in
section 171-37, the board shall pay to the lessee the residual value of the
trees taken and, if there are unharvested crops, the value of the crops.

In the case of breeding livestock that cannot
be relocated or marketed for the breeding value, the board shall pay to the
lessee the difference between the appraised breeding value and the salvage
value, including the cost of transportation to a market on the island on which
the leased land is located. If there is disagreement between the board and the
lessee as to the number of breeding livestock that cannot be relocated or
marketed for breeding value, the issue shall be submitted to the department of
agriculture to make a determination, which shall be final. The appraised
breeding value shall be the fair market value of the livestock, as opposed to
net present value, at the time the board approves the withdrawal or taking of a
portion or all of the leased land. The fair market value shall be determined
by:

(1) An employee of the department of agriculture
qualified to appraise livestock; or

(2) A disinterested livestock appraiser whose
services shall be contracted for by the board,

and the lessee shall be promptly notified of the
determination; provided that should the lessee fail to agree upon the fair
market value, the lessee may appoint the lessee's own livestock appraiser who
together with the board's appraiser shall appoint a third appraiser and the
fair market value shall be determined by arbitration as provided in chapter
658A. The lessee shall pay for the lessee's own livestock appraiser, the board
shall pay for the board's livestock appraiser, and the cost of the third
livestock appraiser shall be borne equally by the lessee and the board.
Whenever more than one livestock appraiser is appointed, each shall prepare and
submit an independent appraisal report.

(b) In addition to compensation received under
subsection (a) or section 171-38, a lessee shall be entitled to compensation for
costs attributable to the diminished use of the leased land, including
reimbursement for the cost of any insurance required by the board to be
maintained, or property tax paid, by the lessee on the portion of the leased
land withdrawn or taken; provided that a lessee of land subject to easements
shall be entitled to compensation under this subsection only if the easements
are placed upon the land subsequent to the original lease and prevent the
lessee from using the land for the original intended use. [L 2013, c 234, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next